Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-822
Ballots; numbering of classes.

When voters are presented with more than one ballot on election day, the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk may number each class of ballots to identify the style, precinct, or number of split ballots for convenience in distributing and counting the ballots. No number shall be placed or printed upon a ballot to be recorded so as to be able to determine the identity of the person who voted such ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 243.